District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1103

petition as to substantial retardation; contents; verification; notice;process

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 604a1, 25 DCR 5094

History

1981 Ed., §§ 21-1102 to 21-1108A.

Prior Codifications